New York, session 2025-2026, S2723.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 13.19 of the parks, recreation and 2 historic preservation law, as amended by chapter 616 of the laws of 3 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, any person who is 5 blind, non-ambulatory, or an amputee or any veteran or member of a Gold 6 Star family shall be permitted to use any of the public campsites, 7 cabins, cottages, parks and other public places of recreation in this 8 state, upon the same terms and conditions as apply to the general 9 public, but without the payment of any fees or other charges for the use 10 of such campsites, cabins, cottages, parks and other public places of 11 recreation. Use of cabins and cottages under this section shall be 12 limited to fourteen days per year. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03069-01-5